Utah statutes.
59-2-918.5.    Hearings on judgment levies -- Advertisement.
(1)  A taxing entity may not impose a judgment levy unless it first advertises
its intention to do so and holds a public hearing in accordance with the
requirements of this section.
(2) (a)  The advertisement required by this section may be combined with the
advertisement described in Section 59-2-919.
(b)  The advertisement shall be at least 1/8 of a page in size and shall meet
the type, placement, and frequency requirements established under Section
59-2-919.
(c) (i)  For taxing entities operating under a July 1 through June 30 fiscal
year the public hearing shall be held at the same time as the hearing at which
the annual budget is adopted.
(ii)  For taxing entities operating under a January 1 through December 31
fiscal year:
(A)  for eligible judgments issued from June 1 through December 15, the public
hearing shall be held at the same time as the hearing at which the annual
budget is adopted; and
(B)  for eligible judgments issued from December 16 through May 31, the public
hearing shall be held at the same time as the hearing at which property tax
levies are set.
(3)  The advertisement shall specify the date, time, and location of the
public hearing at which the levy will be considered and shall set forth the
total amount of the eligible judgment and the tax impact on an average
residential and business property located within the taxing entity.
(4)  If a final decision regarding the judgment levy is not made at the public
hearing, the taxing entity shall announce at the public hearing the scheduled
time and place for consideration and adoption of the judgment levy.
(5)  The date, time, and place of public hearings required by Subsections
(2)(c)(i) and (2)(c)(ii)(B) shall be included on the notice mailed to property
owners pursuant to Section 59-2-919.1.
